Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.800

Criminal justice services programs—Duties of executive committee.

The executive committee created in RCW 10.98.160 shall review the provisions of RCW 43.43.700 through 43.43.785 and the administration thereof and shall consult with and advise the chief of the state patrol on matters pertaining to the policies of criminal justice services program.

[ 1999 c 151 s 1103; 1972 ex.s. c 152 s 21.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Effective date—1999 c 151: See notes following RCW 18.28.010.